Massachusetts, session 194th, H2549.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 8C the following section:-
Section 8D. The annual Consumer Confidence Report on water quality shall include the
following language whenever the fluoride in drinking water is at or above 0.3 ppm:
The offspring of pregnant persons and bottle-fed babies are at risk of developmental
neurotoxicity and damaged teeth from fluoride levels at or above 0.3 ppm;
Diabetics and those with kidney, thyroid, or inflammatory conditions are at risk of
worsening their conditions from consumption of waters at or above 0.3 ppm.
of 1